Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Arbitration Procedures

§ 5661.
Majority action by arbitrators.

The powers of the arbitrators may be exercised by a majority of them, unless otherwise provided by the agreement or by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5662.
Witnesses; subpoenas; depositions.

Arbitrators may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and for the production of books, records, documents, and other evidence, and may administer oaths. Subpoenas so issued shall be served in the manner provided by law for subpoenas in civil actions.

On application of a party and for use as evidence, the arbitrators may permit a deposition to be taken, in the manner and upon the terms designated by the arbitrators, of a witness who cannot be subpoenaed or is unable to attend the hearing.

All provisions of law compelling a person under subpoena to appear and to testify are applicable to subpoenas issued by arbitrators. Upon application, a court shall enforce or quash such a subpoena in the same manner as a subpoena in a civil action.

Fees for attendance as a witness shall be the same as for a witness in the Superior Courts.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5663.
Award.

An arbitration award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrators joining in it. The arbitrators shall deliver a copy to each party personally or by registered mail, or as provided in the agreement.

An award shall be made within the time fixed by the agreement or, if not so fixed, within such time as a court orders. The parties may extend the time in writing either before or after the expiration of an agreed or ordered time. A party waives the objection that an award was not made within the time required unless he or she notifies the arbitrators of his or her objection before the award is delivered to him or her.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5664.
Modification of award by arbitrators.

An award may be modified by the arbitrators:

on application of a party; or

following submission to the arbitrators from a court, and under such conditions as the court may order.

Modification may be made for the purpose of clarifying the award or upon the following grounds:

there was an evident miscalculation of figures or an evident mistake in the description of any person, thing, or property referred to in the award; or

the arbitrators have awarded upon a matter not submitted to them and the award may be corrected without affecting the merits of the decision upon the issues submitted; or

the award is imperfect in a matter of form, not affecting the merits of the controversy.

An application by a party for modification shall be made within 30 days after delivery of the award to the applicant. Written notice thereof shall be given forthwith to the opposing party, stating he or she must serve his or her objections thereto, if any, within 10 days from the notice. The award so modified or corrected is subject to being subsequently confirmed, modified, or vacated by a court.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5665.
Fees and expenses of arbitration.

Unless otherwise provided in the agreement to arbitrate, the arbitrators’ expenses and fees, together with other expenses incurred in the conduct of the arbitration, shall be paid as provided in the award.
An arbitration award may direct the payment of attorney’s fees if the parties have explicitly authorized the arbitrator to make such an award or if the award is based in whole or in part upon State or federal law which permits recovery of attorney’s fees.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5666.
Hearing.

Unless otherwise provided by the agreement:

The arbitrators shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and cause notification to the parties to be served personally or by registered mail not less than five days before the hearing. Appearance at the hearing waives all objections to notice.

The arbitrators may adjourn the hearing from time to time as necessary. On request of a party and for good cause, or upon their own motion, the arbitrators may postpone the hearing to a time not later than the date fixed by the agreement for making the award unless the parties consent to a later date.

The arbitrators may hear and determine the controversy upon the evidence produced notwithstanding the failure of a party duly notified to appear.

The parties are entitled to be heard, to present evidence material to the controversy, and to cross-examine witnesses appearing at the hearing.

The hearing shall be conducted by all the arbitrators but the majority may determine any question and render a final award. If, during the course of the hearing, an arbitrator for any reason ceases to act, the remaining arbitrator or arbitrators appointed to act as neutrals may continue with the hearing and determination of the controversy.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.